North Dakota statutes. TITLE 61 Waters
CHAPTER 61-24 Garrison Diversion Conservancy District
61-24-23.
Provisions governing bonds.

The resolution authorizing the issuance of revenue bonds or refunding bonds under this chapter or resolutions adopted after adoption of the original resolution must prescribe:

The rates of interest, or if an interest rate is variable, the method for calculating the interest rate.

Whether the bonds will be in one or more series.

The dates the bonds will bear.

The times the bonds will mature.

The medium in which the bonds will be payable.

The places where the bonds will be payable.

The terms of redemption, if any, to which the bonds will be subject.

The manner in which the bonds will be executed.

The terms, covenants, and conditions that the bonds will contain.

The form in which the bonds will be issued, either coupon or registered.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 599, § 4.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 2009.

61-24-24.
Sale of bonds — When private sale authorized — Public sale and notice.

Revenue bonds or refunding bonds may be sold at public or private sale on any terms as the board deems appropriate.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 599, § 4.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 2009.

61-24-25.
Notes issued pending preparation of bonds — Negotiability.

Pending the issuance of bonds, bond anticipation notes may be issued and sold in the form and with the provisions determined by the district.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 599, § 4.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 2009.

61-24-26.
Validity of notes and bonds.

Bond anticipation notes, revenue bonds, or refunding bonds bearing the manual or facsimile signatures of the appropriate officers who are in office on the date of signing are valid and binding obligations notwithstanding that before the delivery and payment any or all of the individuals whose signatures appear on the notes or bonds have ceased to be officers of the issuing district. The resolution authorizing the notes or bonds may provide that the notes or bonds must contain a recital that they are issued under this chapter and the recital is conclusive evidence of their validity and of the regularity of their issuance.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 599, § 4.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 2009.

61-24-27.
Notes and bonds exempt from taxation.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the state and all public officers, boards, and agencies, and political subdivisions and agencies of the state, including the public finance authority, all national banking associations, state banks, trust companies, savings banks and institutions, savings and loan associations, credit unions, investment companies, insurance companies, and other entities carrying on an investment business, and executors, administrators, guardians, trustees, and other fiduciaries, may legally invest any sinking funds, moneys, or other funds belonging to them or within their control in any bonds issued under this chapter, and the bonds are authorized security for public deposits. Notes and bonds, including refunding bonds, issued under this chapter and their interest and income are exempt from all taxation by the state or by any political subdivision except inheritance, estate, and transfer taxes.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 599, § 4; 2017, ch. 424, § 2, effective April 19, 2017; 2017, ch. 427, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 2009.

61-24-28.
Covenants and provisions that may be inserted in resolution authorizing bonds.

Any resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds under this chapter may contain covenants and provisions concerning:

The rates, fees, tolls, or charges to be charged for the services, facilities, and commodities of a project.

The use and disposition of all or a portion of the district’s income, profits, and revenues.

The creation, maintenance, regulation, use, and disposition of reserves or sinking funds.

The purpose to which the proceeds of the sale of bonds may be applied and the use and disposition of the proceeds.

The events of default and the rights and liabilities arising upon default and the terms and conditions upon which the holders of bonds issued under this chapter may bring civil action on the bonds.

The creation, priority, and enforcement of liens against the district’s income, profits, or revenues.

The issuance of other or additional bonds or instruments payable from, or constituting a charge against, the district’s income, profits, or revenues.

The creation and use of synthetic interest rate contracts, interest rate caps, floors, and collars, and other techniques to lower the district’s borrowing rate or reduce its exposure to interest rate risk, or both.

The keeping, inspection, and audit of books of account.

The terms and conditions upon which any or all of the bonds become or may be declared due before maturity and the terms and conditions upon which the declaration and its consequences may be waived.

The rights, liabilities, powers, and duties arising upon the breach by the district of any covenants, conditions, or obligations.

The vesting in a trustee of the right to enforce any covenants made to secure, to pay, or in relation to the bonds, the powers and duties of the trustee, and the limitations of liabilities of the trustee.

The terms and conditions upon which the holders of the bonds, or the holders of any proportion or percentage of them, may enforce any covenants made or any duties imposed under this chapter.

A procedure by which the terms of any resolution authorizing bonds or of any other contract with bondholders, including an indenture of trust or similar instrument, may be amended or abrogated, and the amount of bonds that holders of which must consent to the resolution or contract, and the manner in which the consent may be given.

The subordination of the security of any bonds issued under this chapter and the payment of principal and interest on those bonds, to the extent determined feasible and desirable by the governing body, to other bonds or obligations of the district issued to finance or refinance a project or that may be outstanding when the bonds thus subordinated are issued and delivered.

Provisions with respect to the district entering an agreement with a private bond insurer, bank, or other liquidity or credit enhancer for bond insurance, a guarantee, a letter or credit, or any other credit or liquidity enhancement that the district may find to be advantageous or necessary to insure, guaranty, or enhance the payment of the principal of or interest on or liquidity for some or all of the bonds. The cost of the enhancement or liquidity may be paid from bond proceeds or from other funds of the district available for this purpose.

The insurance to be carried upon the project and the use and disposition of insurance moneys.

This section does not authorize the district to do anything in any manner or for any purpose which would result in the creation or incurring of a debt or indebtedness or the issuance of any instrument which would constitute a debt or indebtedness within the meaning of any provision, limitation, or restriction of the Constitution of North Dakota relating to the creation or incurring of a debt or indebtedness or the issuance of an instrument constituting a debt or indebtedness.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 599, § 4.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 2009.

61-24-29.
Liability of district for notes and bonds — Taxing power prohibited.

Bond anticipation notes, revenue bonds, and refunding bonds issued under this chapter may not be payable from or charged upon any funds other than the revenue pledged to the bond’s payment and the district’s notes and bonds may not be subject to any pecuniary liability. The holder of any of these notes or bonds may not enforce payment of the notes or bonds against any tangible real or personal nonrevenue property of the district. Notes and bonds issued under this chapter do not constitute a charge, lien, or encumbrance upon any tangible real or personal nonrevenue property of the district, other than the revenues pledged to their payments. Each note and each bond issued under this chapter must recite in substance that the note or bond and interest on the note or bond is payable solely from the revenue pledged to the payment and that the note or bond does not constitute a debt of the state within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory limitation.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 599, § 4.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 2009.

61-24-30.
Duties of district and officers relative to the issuance of bonds.

To adequately secure the payment of bonds and interest on the bonds, the district and its officers, agents, and employees shall:

Pay or cause to be paid punctually the principal and interest of every bond on the dates, at the places, in the manner, and out of the funds provided in the refunding bond and in accordance with the resolution authorizing its issuance.

Make certain any project financed by the district is operated in an efficient and economical manner, enforce all water purchase and water sales contracts, and establish, levy, maintain, and collect related necessary or proper fees, tolls, rentals, rates, and other charges. The fees, tolls, rentals, rates, and other charges must be sufficient, after making due and reasonable allowances for contingencies and for a margin of error in the estimates, at least to:

Pay all current expenses of operation and maintenance of any project;

Make all payments required under any water purchase contract the district may execute;

Pay the interest and principal on the district’s notes and bonds as they become due;

Comply with the terms of the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or any other contract or agreement with the holders of the funding bonds; and

Meet any other obligations of the district that are charges, liens, or encumbrances upon the revenues of the district.

Operate, maintain, preserve, and keep every part of any tangible project financed and owned or operated by the district in good repair, working order, and condition.

Enforce the provisions of all water purchase and sale contracts that produce revenues pledged to payment of bonds.

Preserve and protect the security of the bonds and the rights of the bondholders and warrant and defend such rights against all claims and demands.

Pay and discharge all lawful claims for labor, materials, and supplies which, if unpaid, might become by law a lien or charge upon the revenues, or any part of the revenues, superior to the lien of the bonds or which might impair the security of the bonds.

Hold in trust the revenues pledged to the payment of the bonds for the benefit of the holders of the bonds and apply the revenues only as provided by the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or, if the resolution is modified, as provided in the modified resolution.

Keep proper separate books of record and accounts of the project in which complete and correct entries must be made of all transactions relating to any part of the project. All books and papers of the district are subject to inspection by the holders of ten percent or more of the outstanding bonds or of their representatives authorized in writing.

The duties contained in this section do not require any expenditure by the district of any funds other than revenue received from a project or water sale contract. The performance of the duties in this section is of the essence of the contract of the district with the bondholders.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 599, § 4.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 2009.

61-24-31.
Remedies of bondholders in general.

Subject to any contractual limitations binding upon the holders of any issue of bonds, or a trustee for the holders, including the restriction of the exercise of any remedy to a specified proportion or percentage of the holders, any holder of bonds or trustee, for the equal benefit and protection of all bondholders similarly situated, may:

By mandamus or other civil action, enforce the holder’s rights against the district and its board and any of its officers, agents, or employees and may require the district or the board or any officers, agents, or employees of the district or board to perform their duties and obligations under this chapter and their covenants and agreements with bondholders.

By civil action, require the district and the board to account as if the district and the board were the trustees of an express trust.

By civil action, enjoin any acts or things that may be unlawful or in violation of the rights of the bondholders.

Bring suit upon the bond.

A right or remedy conferred by this chapter upon any bondholder, or upon any trustee for a bondholder, is not intended to be exclusive of any other right or remedy, but each right or remedy is cumulative and in addition to every other right or remedy and may be exercised without exhausting and without regard to any other remedy conferred by this chapter or by any other law of this state.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 599, § 4.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 2009.

61-24-32.
Bonds as legal investments and security.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the state and all public officers, boards, and agencies, and political subdivisions and agencies of the state, all national banking associations, state banks, trust companies, savings banks and institutions, savings and loan associations, credit unions, investment companies, insurance companies, and other persons carrying on an investment business, and all executors, administrators, guardians, trustees, and other fiduciaries, may legally invest any sinking funds, moneys, or other funds belonging to them or within their control in any bonds issued under this chapter, and the bonds are authorized security for all public deposits.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 599, § 4.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 2009.